Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3205
Unfairness.

If the court determines that the limitation period of another state applicable under section 25-3203 or 25-3204 is substantially different from the limitation period of this state and has not afforded a fair opportunity to sue upon, or imposes an unfair burden in defending against, the claim, the limitation period of this state applies.

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 5.